Hawaii statutes.
PART 5.
FILING

Subpart 1. Filing Office; Contents and

Effectiveness of Financing Statement

§490:9-501 Filing office. (a)
Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), if the local law of this State
governs perfection of a security interest or agricultural lien, the office in
which to file a financing statement to perfect the security interest or
agricultural lien is:

(1) The office designated for the filing or recording
of a record of a mortgage on the related real property, if:

(A) The collateral is as-extracted collateral
or timber to be cut; or

(B) The financing statement is filed as a
fixture filing and the collateral is goods that are or are to become fixtures;
or

(2) The bureau of conveyances, in all other cases,
including a case in which the collateral is goods that are or are to become
fixtures and the financing statement is not filed as a fixture filing.

(b) The office in which to file a financing
statement to perfect a security interest in collateral, including fixtures, of
a transmitting utility is the bureau of conveyances. The financing statement
also constitutes a fixture filing as to the collateral indicated in the
financing statement which is or is to become fixtures. [L 2000, c 241, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next